Mississippi, session 2026, SB2951.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the VFW Post 9832 in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, for the purpose of defraying the costs of the construction, repair and/or renovation of certain infrastructure for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................. $ 125,000.00. SECTION 2.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the VFW Post 9832 expend the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act to assist in paying the costs associated with the renovations, repairs and/or construction of certain infrastructure requirements to the Post building and Post activities associated with the requirements and accessibility plan of the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) of 1990, Public Law 101-336. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.